Utah statutes.
23-15-3.   Diversion of water prohibited -- Exception for flood control.

Except in anticipation of and to provide for the carrying away and the safe disposal of natural storm and flood waters, no person may, without existing rights, divert so much water from any natural stream, lake, pond or natural lake or pond, the natural storage content of which has been increased by the construction of a dam, that the diversion unduly endangers protected aquatic wildlife.



Amended by Chapter 347, 1983 General Session

